Hawaii statutes.
[§432:1-618] Human immunodeficiency virus
and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome screening coverage. (a) Each
hospital or medical service plan contract issued or renewed in this State,
except for plan contracts that only provide coverage for specified diseases or
other limited benefit coverage, shall provide coverage for annual screenings
for sexually transmitted diseases, including screenings for human
immunodeficiency virus and acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.

(b) Each mutual benefit society shall
reimburse all costs associated with the coverage under subsection (a) to any
physician or health care provider complying with this section. [L 2016, c 204, §3]

Note

Applicability of section. L 2016, c 204, §§6, 8.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next